es: Diseño de la base de la bañera: Garra; Independiente; Plataforma; Otros
en: Bathtub base design: Clawfoot; Free-standing; Platform; Other
ja: バスタブの台座の種類: クローフット; 自立型; プラットフォーム; その他
vi: Thiết kế chân bồn tắm: Chân rồng; Đứng một mình; Bệ đỡ; Khác
sv: Design av badkarsbotten: Clawfoot; Fristående; Plattform; Övrigt
it: Design della base della vasca: Artiglio; Da posizionamento libero; Piattaforma; Altro
de: Design des Badewannenunterbaus: Klauenfuß; Freistehend; Plattform; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 浴缸底座設計: 爪足; 獨立式; 平台; 其他
nl: Ontwerp badkuip: Klauwvoet; Vrijstaand; Platform; Andere
sl-SI: Zasnova podnožja kopalne kadi: Samostoječa z nogicami; Prostostoječa; Platforma; Drugo
hr-HR: Dizajn postolja kade: S nogama; Samostojeća; Platforma; Ostalo
ko: 욕조 받침 디자인: 갈퀴발; 독립형; 플랫폼; 기타
da: Badekarbasedesign: Klofod; Fritstående; Platform; Andet
tr: Küvet taban tasarımı: Pençe ayak; Bağımsız; Platform; Diğer
bg-BG: Дизайн на основата на ваната: Вана на крака; Свободностояща; Платформа; Други
ro-RO: Design bază pentru cadă: Picior cu gheare; Fără picioare; Platformă; Altele
hu: Fürdőkádalap kialakítása: Oroszlánlábas; Szabadon álló; Emelvényen álló; Egyéb
sk-SK: Dizajn podstavca vane: Voľne stojaca vaňa na nožičkách; Voľne stojaci; Plošina; Iné
zh-CN: 浴缸底座设计: 爪脚; 自力支撑; 平台; 其他
pt-BR: Formato da base da banheira: Pé de garra; Sem suporte; Plataforma; Outro
cs: Konstrukce základny vany: Nožičky; Volně stojící; Platforma; Jiné
pl: Projekt podstawy wanny: Szponiasta stopa; Wolnostojący; Platforma; Inne
lt-LT: Vonios pagrindo dizainas: Su kojelėmis; Laisvai pastatoma; Su sienele; Kita
th: การออกแบบฐานอ่างอาบน้ำ: ขารอง; ตั้งพื้น; แท่นยึด; อื่นๆ
el: Σχέδιο βάσης μπανιέρας: Clawfoot; Ελεύθερης τοποθέτησης; Ένθετη; Άλλο
nb: Grunndesign for badekar: Klofot; Frittstående; Plattform; Annet
ru: Тип каркаса или ножек для ванны: Ванна на ножках; Отдельно стоящий; Платформа; Другое
fr: Conception de la base de la baignoire: Sur pieds; Sur pied; Plateforme; Autre
fi: Kylpyammeen pohjan muotoilu: Kylpyammeen jalat; Vapaasti seisova; Alusta; Muu
pt-PT: Design de base de banheira: Banheira com pés; Sem suporte; Plataforma; Outro